North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 4B. Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.
§ 148-65.6.
Implementation of the compact. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The North Carolina State Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision shall be established, consisting of 14 members. North Carolina’s Commissioner to the Interstate Compact Commission is a member of the State Council and serves as chair of the State Council. The remaining members of the State Council shall consist of the following:

One member representing the executive branch, to be appointed by the Governor;

One member from a victim’s assistance group, to be appointed by the Governor;

One at-large member, to be appointed by the Governor;

One member of the Senate, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

One member of the House of Representatives, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

A superior court judge, to be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;

(6a)

A district court judge, to be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;

Four members representing the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, to be appointed by the Director of the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice;

A district attorney, to be appointed by the Governor; and

A sheriff, to be appointed by the Governor.

(a1)

The Governor, in consultation with the legislature and judiciary, shall appoint the Compact Administrator. The Compact Administrator shall be appointed by the State Council as North Carolina’s Commissioner to the Interstate Compact Commission.

The State Council shall meet at least twice a year and may also hold special meetings at the call of the chairperson. All terms are for three years.

The State Council may advise the Compact Administrator on participation in the Interstate Commission activities and administration of the compact.

The members of the State Council shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the policies of the Office of State Budget and Management.

The State Council shall act in an advisory capacity to the Secretary of Public Safety concerning this State’s participation in Interstate Commission activities and other duties as may be determined by each member state, including recommendations for policy concerning the operations and procedures of the compact within this State.

The Governor shall by executive order provide for any other matters necessary for implementation of the compact at the time that it becomes effective, and, except as otherwise provided for in this section, the State Council may promulgate rules or regulations necessary to implement and administer the compact.

History.

2002-166, s. 1; 2008-189, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i), (k); 2017-186, s. 2(llllllll).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (v), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-189, s. 1, effective August 7, 2008, in subsection (a), substituted “14” for “11” in the first sentence, rewrote the second sentence; added subdivisions (a)(6a), (a)(8) and (a)(9); and added subsection (a1).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(
llllllll
), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” twice in subdivision (a)(7).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (v), substituted “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry” for “Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in subdivision (a)(7) and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in subsection (e). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-65.6.
Implementation of the compact. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The North Carolina State Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision shall be established, consisting of 14 members. North Carolina’s Commissioner to the Interstate Compact Commission is a member of the State Council and serves as chair of the State Council. The remaining members of the State Council shall consist of the following:

One member representing the executive branch, to be appointed by the Governor;

One member from a victim’s assistance group, to be appointed by the Governor;

One at-large member, to be appointed by the Governor;

One member of the Senate, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

One member of the House of Representatives, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

A superior court judge, to be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;

(6a)

A district court judge, to be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;

Four members representing the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry, to be appointed by the Director of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry;

A district attorney, to be appointed by the Governor; and

A sheriff, to be appointed by the Governor.

(a1)

The Governor, in consultation with the legislature and judiciary, shall appoint the Compact Administrator. The Compact Administrator shall be appointed by the State Council as North Carolina’s Commissioner to the Interstate Compact Commission.

The State Council shall meet at least twice a year and may also hold special meetings at the call of the chairperson. All terms are for three years.

The State Council may advise the Compact Administrator on participation in the Interstate Commission activities and administration of the compact.

The members of the State Council shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the policies of the Office of State Budget and Management.

The State Council shall act in an advisory capacity to the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction concerning this State’s participation in Interstate Commission activities and other duties as may be determined by each member state, including recommendations for policy concerning the operations and procedures of the compact within this State.

The Governor shall by executive order provide for any other matters necessary for implementation of the compact at the time that it becomes effective, and, except as otherwise provided for in this section, the State Council may promulgate rules or regulations necessary to implement and administer the compact.

History.

2002-166, s. 1; 2008-189, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i), (k); 2017-186, s. 2(llllllll); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (v).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (v), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-189, s. 1, effective August 7, 2008, in subsection (a), substituted “14” for “11” in the first sentence, rewrote the second sentence; added subdivisions (a)(6a), (a)(8) and (a)(9); and added subsection (a1).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(
llllllll
), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” twice in subdivision (a)(7).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (v), substituted “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry” for “Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in subdivision (a)(7) and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in subsection (e). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-65.7.
Fees. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Persons convicted in this State who make a request for transfer to another state pursuant to the compact shall pay a transfer application of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for each transfer application submitted. The transfer application fee shall be paid to the Compact Commissioner upon submission of the transfer application. The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee may waive the application fee if either the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee finds that payment of the fee will constitute an undue economic burden on the offender.All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Interstate Compact Fund and shall be used only to support administration of the Interstate Compact.The Interstate Compact Fund is established within the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety as a nonreverting, interest-bearing special revenue account. Accordingly, revenue in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year does not revert, and interest and other investment income earned by the Fund shall be credited to it. All moneys collected by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be deposited and held in this Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used to supplement funds otherwise available to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the administration of the Interstate Compact.

Persons supervised in this State pursuant to this compact shall pay the supervision fee specified in G.S. 15A-1374(c). The fee shall be paid to the clerk of court in the county in which the person initially receives supervision services in this State. The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee may waive the fee if either the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee finds that payment of the fee will constitute an undue economic burden on the offender.

History.

2002-166, s. 1; 2008-189, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(h), 31.25; 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmmmmm).

§ 148-65.7.
Fees. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Persons convicted in this State who make a request for transfer to another state pursuant to the compact shall pay a transfer application of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for each transfer application submitted. The transfer application fee shall be paid to the Compact Commissioner upon submission of the transfer application. The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee may waive the application fee if either the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee finds that payment of the fee will constitute an undue economic burden on the offender.All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Interstate Compact Fund and shall be used only to support administration of the Interstate Compact.The Interstate Compact Fund is established within the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction as a nonreverting, interest-bearing special revenue account. Accordingly, revenue in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year does not revert, and interest and other investment income earned by the Fund shall be credited to it. All moneys collected by the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be deposited and held in this Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used to supplement funds otherwise available to the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction for the administration of the Interstate Compact.

Persons supervised in this State pursuant to this compact shall pay the supervision fee specified in G.S. 15A-1374(c). The fee shall be paid to the clerk of court in the county in which the person initially receives supervision services in this State. The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee may waive the fee if either the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee finds that payment of the fee will constitute an undue economic burden on the offender.

History.

2002-166, s. 1; 2008-189, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(h), 31.25; 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmmmmm); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t).

§ 148-65.8.
Interstate parole and probation hearing procedures.

Where supervision of an offender is being administered pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, the appropriate judicial or administrative authorities in this State shall notify the Compact Administrator of the sending state whenever, in their view, consideration should be given to retaking or reincarceration for a parole, probation, or post-release supervision violation. Prior to the giving of any such notification, a hearing shall be held in accordance with this section within a reasonable time, unless such hearing is waived by the offender. Pending any proceeding pursuant to this section, the appropriate officers of this State may take custody of and detain the offender involved for a period not to exceed 15 days prior to the hearing. The offender shall not be entitled to bail pending the hearing.

Any hearing pursuant to this section may be before the Administrator of the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, a deputy of the Administrator, any other person appointed by the Administrator, or any person authorized pursuant to the laws of this State to hear cases of alleged parole, probation, or post-release supervision violation, except that no hearing officer shall be the person making the allegation of violation.

With respect to any hearing pursuant to this section, the offender:

Shall have reasonable notice in writing of the nature and content of the allegations to be made, including notice that its purpose is to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the offender has committed a violation that may lead to a revocation of parole, probation, or post-release supervision.

Shall be permitted to advise with any persons whose assistance the offender reasonably desires, prior to the hearing.

Shall have the right to confront and examine any persons who have made allegations against the offender, unless the hearing officer determines that such confrontation would present a substantial present or subsequent danger of harm to such person or persons.

May admit, deny, or explain the violation alleged and may present proof, including affidavits and other evidence, in support of the offender’s contentions.

(c1)

A record of the hearing shall be made and preserved. As soon as practicable following termination of any hearing conducted pursuant to this section or the waiver of such hearing, the appropriate officer or officers of this State shall report to the sending state, furnish a copy of the hearing record, and make recommendations regarding the disposition to be made of the offender by the sending state. If the hearing recommendation is to retake or reincarcerate the offender, the hearing officer or officers may detain the offender until notice is received from the sending state. If the sending state provides notice that it intends to retake or reincarcerate the offender, the offender shall remain in custody for such reasonable period after the hearing or waiver as may be necessary to arrange for the retaking or reincarceration.

In any case of alleged parole or probation violation by a person being supervised in another state pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, any appropriate judicial or administrative officer or agency in another state may hold a hearing on the alleged violation. Upon receipt of the record of a parole, probation, or post-release supervision violation hearing held in another state pursuant to a statute substantially similar to this section, that record shall have the same standing and effect as though the proceeding of which it is a record was had before the appropriate officer or officers in this State, and any recommendations contained in or accompanying the record shall be fully considered by the appropriate officer or officers of this State in making disposition of the matter.

History.

2002-166, s. 1; 2008-189, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-189, s. 1, effective August 7, 2008, substituted “Adult Offender Supervision” for “the Supervision of Adult Offenders” throughout; in subsection (a), deleted the former third sentence relating to reporting to the sending state, deleted the end of the former fourth sentence related to the period necessary to arrange for retaking or reincarceration, added the last sentence; in subdivision (c)(4), deleted the last sentence relating to preserving a record of the proceedings; and added subsection (c1).

§ 148-65.9.
North Carolina sentence to be served in another jurisdiction. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission, with the concurrence of the Secretary of Public Safety, may direct that the balance of any sentence imposed by the courts of this State shall be served concurrently with a sentence or sentences in another state or federal institution and may effect a transfer of custody of such individual to the other jurisdiction for such purpose. In the event the individual’s sentence liability in the other jurisdiction terminates prior to the expiration of the individual’s North Carolina sentence, the individual shall be either paroled (if eligible) or returned to the prison department of this State, in the discretion of the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission.

History.

2002-166, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-65.9

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-65.9.
North Carolina sentence to be served in another jurisdiction. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission, with the concurrence of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, may direct that the balance of any sentence imposed by the courts of this State shall be served concurrently with a sentence or sentences in another state or federal institution and may effect a transfer of custody of such individual to the other jurisdiction for such purpose. In the event the individual’s sentence liability in the other jurisdiction terminates prior to the expiration of the individual’s North Carolina sentence, the individual shall be either paroled (if eligible) or returned to the prison department of this State, in the discretion of the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission.

History.

2002-166, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-65.9

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.